Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3242
Districts; water projects; powers.

Each district shall have the power and authority to (1) build or construct, operate and maintain, any reservoir, dike or levee to prevent overflow of water, (2) drain any cropland subject to overflow by water, or drain wet land when desirable to make reasonable use of such land whether such condition is caused by surface water or ground water, or drain any land which will be improved by drainage, (3) locate and construct, straighten, widen, deepen, or alter and maintain any ditch, drain, stream, or watercourse, (4) riprap or otherwise protect the bank of any stream or ditch, and (5) construct, enlarge, extend, improve, or maintain any stream of drainage or system of control of surface water.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 42, p. 126.